Washington statutes.
RCW 7.69.040

Representation of incapacitated or incompetent victim.

For purposes of this chapter, a victim who is incapacitated or otherwise incompetent shall be represented by a parent or present legal guardian, or if none exists, by a representative designated by the prosecuting attorney without court appointment or legal guardianship proceedings. Any victim may designate another person as the victim's representative for purposes of the rights enumerated in RCW 7.69.030.

[ 1985 c 443 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 443: See notes following RCW 7.69.010.